dictionaries/isv_cyr_hunspell_dict.aff
FLAG long
SFX FM Y 27
SFX FM ти ју .
SFX FM ти м .
SFX FM ти јеш .
SFX FM ти ш .
SFX FM ти је .
SFX FM ти 0 .
SFX FM ти јемо .
SFX FM ти мо .
SFX FM ти јете .
SFX FM и е .
SFX FM ти јут .
SFX FM ти х .
SFX FM ти ше .
SFX FM ти хмо .
SFX FM ти сте .
SFX FM ти ху .
SFX FM ти ј .
SFX FM ти јмо .
SFX FM ти јте .
SFX FM ти нје/xPxE .
SFX FM ти нја/xPxE .
SFX FM ти нју/xPxE .
SFX FM ти нјем/xPxE .
SFX FM ти ниј/xPxE .
SFX FM ти нјам/xPxE .
SFX FM ти нјами/xPxE .
SFX FM ти нјах/xPxE .

SFX FN Y 68
SFX FN ти л .
SFX FN ти ла .
SFX FN ти ло .
SFX FN ти ли .
SFX FN етєти єчу .
SFX FN етєти єтим .
SFX FN етєти єтиш .
SFX FN етєти єти .
SFX FN етєти єтимо .
SFX FN етєти єтите .
SFX FN етєти єтет .
SFX FN ти х .
SFX FN ти ше .
SFX FN ти хмо .
SFX FN ти сте .
SFX FN ти ху .
SFX FN етєти єтечи .
SFX FN етєти єтеча .
SFX FN етєти єтече .
SFX FN етєти єтимы .
SFX FN етєти єтимого .
SFX FN етєти єтимому .
SFX FN етєти єтимым .
SFX FN етєти єтимом .
SFX FN етєти єтимо .
SFX FN етєти єтима .
SFX FN етєти єтиму .
SFX FN етєти єтимој .
SFX FN етєти єтимоју .
SFX FN етєти єтими .
SFX FN етєти єтиме .
SFX FN етєти єтимых .
SFX FN етєти єтимым .
SFX FN етєти єтимыми .
SFX FN ти вши .
SFX FN ти вшего .
SFX FN ти вшему .
SFX FN ти вшим .
SFX FN ти вшем .
SFX FN ти вших .
SFX FN ти вшими .
SFX FN ти вша .
SFX FN ти вшу .
SFX FN ти вшеј .
SFX FN ти вшеју .
SFX FN ти вше .
SFX FN ти ны .
SFX FN ти ного .
SFX FN ти ному .
SFX FN ти ным .
SFX FN ти ном .
SFX FN ти ни .
SFX FN ти не .
SFX FN ти ных .
SFX FN ти ными .
SFX FN ти на .
SFX FN ти ну .
SFX FN ти ној .
SFX FN ти ноју .
SFX FN ти но .
SFX FN ти нје/xPxE .
SFX FN ти нја/xPxE .
SFX FN ти нју/xPxE .
SFX FN ти нјем/xPxE .
SFX FN ти ниј/xPxE .
SFX FN ти нјам/xPxE .
SFX FN ти нјами/xPxE .
SFX FN ти нјах/xPxE .

SFX FO Y 87
SFX FO ти л .
SFX FO ти ла .
SFX FO ти ло .
SFX FO ти ли .
SFX FO ти ју .
SFX FO ти м .
SFX FO ти јеш .
SFX FO ти ш .
SFX FO ти је .
SFX FO ти 0 .
SFX FO ти јемо .
SFX FO ти мо .
SFX FO ти јете .
SFX FO и е .
SFX FO ти јут .
SFX FO ти х .
SFX FO ти ше .
SFX FO ти хмо .
SFX FO ти сте .
SFX FO ти ху .
SFX FO ти ј .
SFX FO ти јмо .
SFX FO ти јте .
SFX FO ти јучи .
SFX FO ти јучего .
SFX FO ти јучему .
SFX FO ти јучим .
SFX FO ти јучем .
SFX FO ти јучих .
SFX FO ти јучими .
SFX FO ти јучагајуче .
SFX FO ти јучугајуче .
SFX FO ти јучејгајуче .
SFX FO ти јучејугајуче .
SFX FO ти јемы .
SFX FO ти јемого .
SFX FO ти јемому .
SFX FO ти јемым .
SFX FO ти јемом .
SFX FO ти јемо .
SFX FO ти јема .
SFX FO ти јему .
SFX FO ти јемој .
SFX FO ти јемоју .
SFX FO ти јеми .
SFX FO ти јеме .
SFX FO ти јемых .
SFX FO ти јемым .
SFX FO ти јемыми .
SFX FO ти јемогамы .
SFX FO ти јемогамого .
SFX FO ти јемогамому .
SFX FO ти јемогамым .
SFX FO ти јемогамом .
SFX FO ти јемогамо .
SFX FO ти вши .
SFX FO ти вшего .
SFX FO ти вшему .
SFX FO ти вшим .
SFX FO ти вшем .
SFX FO ти вших .
SFX FO ти вшими .
SFX FO ти вшагавше .
SFX FO ти вшугавше .
SFX FO ти вшејгавше .
SFX FO ти вшејугавше .
SFX FO ти ны .
SFX FO ти ного .
SFX FO ти ному .
SFX FO ти ным .
SFX FO ти ном .
SFX FO ти ни .
SFX FO ти не .
SFX FO ти ных .
SFX FO ти ными .
SFX FO ти нагано .
SFX FO ти нугано .
SFX FO ти нојгано .
SFX FO ти нојугано .
SFX FO ти нје/xPxE .
SFX FO ти нја/xPxE .
SFX FO ти нју/xPxE .
SFX FO ти нјем/xPxE .
SFX FO ти ниј/xPxE .
SFX FO ти нјам/xPxE .
SFX FO ти нјами/xPxE .
SFX FO ти нјах/xPxE .

SFX FP Y 50
SFX FP ти л .
SFX FP ти ла .
SFX FP ти ло .
SFX FP ти ли .
SFX FP ти 0 .
SFX FP ути ем .
SFX FP ути еш .
SFX FP ути е .
SFX FP ути емо .
SFX FP ути ете .
SFX FP и 0 .
SFX FP ти х .
SFX FP ти ше .
SFX FP ти хмо .
SFX FP ти сте .
SFX FP ти ху .
SFX FP ути и .
SFX FP ути имо .
SFX FP ути ите .
SFX FP ти чи .
SFX FP ти чагнуче .
SFX FP ути емы .
SFX FP ути емого .
SFX FP ути емому .
SFX FP ути емым .
SFX FP ути емом .
SFX FP ути емо .
SFX FP ути емагнемо .
SFX FP ути емугнемо .
SFX FP ути емојгнемо .
SFX FP ути емојугнемо .
SFX FP ути емигнемо .
SFX FP ути емегнемо .
SFX FP ути емыхгнемо .
SFX FP ути емымгнемо .
SFX FP ути емымигнемо .
SFX FP ти вши .
SFX FP ти вшего .
SFX FP ти вшему .
SFX FP ти вшим .
SFX FP ти вшем .
SFX FP ти вших .
SFX FP ти вшими .
SFX FP ти вшагнувше .
SFX FP ти вшугнувше .
SFX FP ти вшејгнувше .
SFX FP ти вшејугнувше .
SFX FP и ы .
SFX FP и агнуто .
SFX FP и је .

SFX FQ Y 6
SFX FQ 0 0/xPxE .
SFX FQ е о/xPxBxO .
SFX FQ е ов/xPxE .
SFX FQ е ах/xPxE .
SFX FQ е ам/xPxE .
SFX FQ е ами/xPxE .

SFX FR Y 10
SFX FR 0 0/xPxE .
SFX FR о о/xPxBxO .
SFX FR о е/xPxE .
SFX FR о ы/xPxE .
SFX FR 0 го/xPxE .
SFX FR о ых/xPxE .
SFX FR 0 м/xPxE .
SFX FR 0 му/xPxE .
SFX FR о ым/xPxE .
SFX FR о ыми/xPxE .

SFX FS Y 10
SFX FS 0 0/xPxE .
SFX FS и о/xPxBxO .
SFX FS и е/xPxE .
SFX FS и у/xPxE .
SFX FS ки ок/xPxE .
SFX FS и ах/xPxE .
SFX FS и ам/xPxE .
SFX FS и еју/xPxE .
SFX FS и ами/xPxE .
SFX FS и о/xPxE .

SFX FT Y 11
SFX FT 0 0/xPxE .
SFX FT а е/xPxBxO .
SFX FT а е/xPxE .
SFX FT а у/xPxE .
SFX FT ша еш/xPxE .
SFX FT а и/xPxE .
SFX FT 0 х/xPxE .
SFX FT 0 м/xPxE .
SFX FT а еју/xPxE .
SFX FT 0 ми/xPxE .
SFX FT а о/xPxE .

SFX FU Y 4
SFX FU єстє охсот .
SFX FU єстє охстах .
SFX FU єстє омстам .
SFX FU єстє омастами .

SFX FV Y 10
SFX FV 0 0/xPxE .
SFX FV о е/xPxBxO .
SFX FV о е/xPxE .
SFX FV о а/xPxE .
SFX FV о 0 .
SFX FV о у/xPxE .
SFX FV о ах/xPxE .
SFX FV о ам/xPxE .
SFX FV о ем/xPxE .
SFX FV о ами/xPxE .

SFX FW Y 7
SFX FW 0 0/xPxE .
SFX FW 0 те/xPxE .
SFX FW 0 та/xPxE .
SFX FW 0 ти/xPxE .
SFX FW 0 ту/xPxE .
SFX FW 0 тем/xPxE .
SFX FW 0 том/xPxE .

SFX FX Y 28
SFX FX 0 0/xPxE .
SFX FX 0 о/xBxPxE .
SFX FX 0 а/xPxE .
SFX FX 0 ого/xPxE .
SFX FX 0 у/xPxE .
SFX FX 0 ој/xPxE .
SFX FX 0 ом/xPxE .
SFX FX 0 ому/xPxE .
SFX FX 0 ым/xPxE .
SFX FX 0 оју/xPxE .
SFX FX 0 и/xPxE .
SFX FX 0 е/xPxE .
SFX FX 0 ых/xPxE .
SFX FX 0 ыми/xPxE .
SFX FX 0 єјши/zz .
SFX FX 0 єјшего/zz .
SFX FX 0 єјшему/zz .
SFX FX 0 єјшим/zz .
SFX FX 0 єјшем/zz .
SFX FX 0 єјше/zz .
SFX FX 0 єјша/zz .
SFX FX 0 єјшу/zz .
SFX FX 0 єјшеј/zz .
SFX FX 0 єјшеју/zz .
SFX FX 0 єјших/zz .
SFX FX 0 єјшим/zz .
SFX FX 0 єјшими/zz .
SFX FX 0 єје/zz .

SFX FY Y 11
SFX FY 0 0/xPxE .
SFX FY 0 о/xPxBxO .
SFX FY ек ки/xPxE .
SFX FY ек ка/xPxE .
SFX FY ек ков/xPxE .
SFX FY ек ку/xPxE .
SFX FY ек ках/xPxE .
SFX FY ек кам/xPxE .
SFX FY ек ком/xPxE .
SFX FY ек ками/xPxE .
SFX FY ек че/xPxE .

SFX FZ Y 10
SFX FZ 0 0/xPxE .
SFX FZ 0 о/xPxBxO .
SFX FZ ет те/xPxE .
SFX FZ ет та/xPxE .
SFX FZ ет тев/xPxE .
SFX FZ ет ту/xPxE .
SFX FZ ет тах/xPxE .
SFX FZ ет там/xPxE .
SFX FZ ет тем/xPxE .
SFX FZ ет тами/xPxE .

SFX Fa Y 17
SFX Fa 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Fa о о/xPxBxO .
SFX Fa о а/xPxE .
SFX Fa го жеса/xPxE .
SFX Fa го жесе/xPxE .
SFX Fa о 0 .
SFX Fa го жес/xPxE .
SFX Fa о у/xPxE .
SFX Fa го жеси/xPxE .
SFX Fa о ах/xPxE .
SFX Fa го жесах/xPxE .
SFX Fa о ам/xPxE .
SFX Fa го жесам/xPxE .
SFX Fa 0 м/xPxE .
SFX Fa го жесем/xPxE .
SFX Fa о ами/xPxE .
SFX Fa го жесами/xPxE .

SFX Fb Y 10
SFX Fb 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Fb 0 е/xPxBxO .
SFX Fb ец це/xPxE .
SFX Fb ец ца/xPxE .
SFX Fb ец цев/xPxE .
SFX Fb ец цу/xPxE .
SFX Fb ец цах/xPxE .
SFX Fb ец цам/xPxE .
SFX Fb ец цем/xPxE .
SFX Fb ец цами/xPxE .

SFX Fc Y 11
SFX Fc 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Fc 0 о/xPxBxO .
SFX Fc ек кы/xPxE .
SFX Fc ек ка/xPxE .
SFX Fc ек ков/xPxE .
SFX Fc ек ку/xPxE .
SFX Fc ек ках/xPxE .
SFX Fc ек кам/xPxE .
SFX Fc ек ком/xPxE .
SFX Fc ек ками/xPxE .
SFX Fc ек че/xPxE .
