dictionaries/isv_cyr_hunspell_dict.dic
слушати/FM
послушати/FM
прилетєти/FN
сегати/FO
сегнути/FP
пантофле/FQ
шампанско/FR
виски/FS
виски/FS
мша/FT
двєстє/FU
ададжо/FV
алое/FW
бабин/FX
банджо/FV
братов/FX
бычек/FY
чртов/FX
дєдов/FX
дегет/FZ
иго/Fa
јасенец/Fb
кабачек/Fc
кралјев/FX
ланјец/Fb
мамин/FX
материн/FX
мужев/FX
облачек/Fc
рад/FX
замша/FT
језычек/Fc
